Nevada, session 83, SB409.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 432B.160 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
432B.160 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
immunity from civil or criminal liability extends to every person
who in good faith:
(a) Makes a report pursuant to NRS 432B.220;
(b) Conducts an interview or allows an interview to be taken
pursuant to NRS 432B.270;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(c) Allows , [or] takes , reviews or provides consultation or a
medical opinion concerning photographs or X-rays pursuant to
NRS 432B.270;
(d) Causes a medical test to be performed pursuant to
NRS 432B.270;
(e) Reviews or provides consultation or a medical opinion
concerning a medical test performed pursuant to NRS 432B.270;
(f) Provides a record, or a copy thereof, of a medical test
performed pursuant to NRS 432B.270 to an agency which provides
child welfare services to the child, a law enforcement agency that
participated in the investigation of the report made pursuant to NRS
432B.220 or the prosecuting attorney’s office;
[(f)] (g) Holds a child pursuant to NRS 432B.400, takes
possession of a child pursuant to NRS 432B.630 or places a child in
protective custody pursuant to any provision of this chapter;
[(g)] (h) Performs any act pursuant to subsection 2 of
NRS 432B.630;
[(h)] (i) Refers a case or recommends the filing of a petition
pursuant to NRS 432B.380; or
[(i)] (j) Participates in a judicial proceeding resulting from a
referral or recommendation.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not confer any immunity
from liability for the negligent performance of any act pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS 432B.630.
3. In any proceeding to impose liability against a person for:
(a) Making a report pursuant to NRS 432B.220; or
(b) Performing any act set forth in paragraphs (b) to [(i),] (j),
inclusive, of subsection 1,
 there is a presumption that the person acted in good faith.
4. If a person who is required to report the abuse or neglect
of a child pursuant to NRS 432B.220 prevails in a civil action
brought to impose liability against the person for performing any
act described in subsection 1, the court may award reasonable
attorney’s fees and costs incurred by the person in defending the
action.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)